New York, session 2025-2026, A977.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 125 of the cannabis law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 13 to read as follows: 3 13. (a) No person shall cultivate, process, distribute for sale or 4 sell at wholesale or retail or deliver to consumers: 5 (i) any cannabis flower which has a concentration of more than fifteen 6 percent delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol; or 7 (ii) any cannabis, cannabis product, medical cannabis or cannabinoid 8 hemp or hemp extract product which has a concentration of more than 9 twenty-five percent delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol. 10 (b) Any person who knowingly violates this subdivision is guilty of a 11 class B misdemeanor. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03102-01-5